Massachusetts, session 194th, H1957.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 24 of chapter 90 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding, after the last
sentence in subsection (1)(c)(4), the following new sentence:- Notwithstanding any contrary
provision of section 100A of chapter 276 of the General Laws, any such prior conviction, if
otherwise admissible, shall not be inadmissible because it has been sealed pursuant to that
section.
of 1